Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,108
Resignation and removal of officers.

(MBCA 8.43) (a) An officer
may resign at any time by delivering notice to the corporation. A resignation
is effective when the notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later
effective time. If a resignation is made effective at a later time and the
board or the appointing officer accepts the future effective time, the board
or the appointing officer may fill the pending vacancy before the effective
time if the board or the appointing officer provides that the successor does
not take office until the effective time.

(b) An officer may be
removed at any time with or without cause by (1) the board of directors, (2)
the officer who appointed such officer, unless the bylaws or the board of
directors provide otherwise, or (3) any other officer if authorized by the
bylaws or the board of directors.

(c) In this section, appointing officer means the
officer, including any successor to that officer, who appointed the officer
resigning or being removed.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 108.